California statutes. Civil Code
(g) A common interest development that willfully violates this section shall be liable to the applicant or other party for actual damages, and shall pay a civil penalty to the applicant or other party in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(h) In accordance with Section 4740, this section does not change the right of an owner of a separate interest who acquired title to their separate interest before the effective date of this section to rent or lease their property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 360, Sec. 6.   (AB 1584)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4745.

(a) Any covenant, restriction, or condition contained in any deed, contract, security instrument, or other instrument affecting the transfer or sale of any interest in a common interest development, and any provision of a governing document, as defined in Section 4150, that either effectively prohibits or unreasonably restricts the installation or use of an electric vehicle charging station within an owner’s unit or in a designated parking space, including, but not limited to, a deeded parking space, a parking space in an owner’s exclusive use common area, or a parking space that is specifically designated for use by a particular owner, or is in conflict with this section is void and unenforceable.

(b) (1) This section does not apply to
 provisions that impose reasonable restrictions on electric vehicle charging stations. However, it is the policy of the state to promote, encourage, and remove obstacles to the use of electric vehicle charging stations.

(2) For purposes of this section, “reasonable restrictions” are restrictions that do not significantly increase the cost of the station or significantly decrease its efficiency or specified performance.

(c) An electric vehicle charging station shall meet applicable health and safety standards and requirements imposed by state and local authorities, and all other applicable zoning, land use, or other ordinances, or land use permits.

(d) For purposes of this section, “electric vehicle charging station” means a station that is designed in compliance with the California Building Standards Code and delivers
 electricity from a source outside an electric vehicle into one or more electric vehicles. An electric vehicle charging station may include several charge points simultaneously connecting several electric vehicles to the station and any related equipment needed to facilitate charging plug-in electric vehicles.

(e) If approval is required for the installation or use of an electric vehicle charging station, the application for approval shall be processed and approved by the association in the same manner as an application for approval of an architectural modification to the property, and shall not be willfully avoided or delayed. The approval or denial of an application shall be in writing. If an application is not denied in writing within 60 days from the date of receipt of the application, the application shall be deemed approved, unless that delay is the result of a reasonable request for additional information.

(f) If the electric vehicle charging station is to be placed in a common area or an exclusive use common area, as designated in the common interest development’s declaration, the following provisions apply:

(1) The owner first shall obtain approval from the association to install the electric vehicle charging station and the association shall approve the installation if the owner agrees in writing to do all of the following:

(A) Comply with the association’s architectural standards for the installation of the charging station.

(B) Engage a licensed contractor to install the charging station.

(C) Within 14 days of approval, provide a certificate of insurance
 as required by paragraph (3).

(D) Pay for both the costs associated with the installation of and the electricity usage associated with the charging station.

(2) The owner and each successive owner of the charging station shall be responsible for all of the following:

(A) Costs for damage to the charging station, common area, exclusive use common area, or separate interests resulting from the installation, maintenance, repair, removal, or replacement of the charging station.

(B) Costs for the maintenance, repair, and replacement of the charging station until it has been removed and for the restoration of the common area after removal.

(C) The cost of
 electricity associated with the charging station.

(D) Disclosing to prospective buyers the existence of any charging station of the owner and the related responsibilities of the owner under this section.

(3) The owner of the charging station, whether located within a separate unit or within the common area or exclusive use common area, shall, at all times, maintain a liability coverage policy. The owner that submitted the application to install the charging station shall provide the association with the corresponding certificate of insurance within 14 days of approval of the application. That owner and each successor owner shall provide the association with the certificate of insurance annually thereafter.

(4) A homeowner shall not be required to maintain a homeowner liability coverage policy for an existing National
 Electrical Manufacturers Association standard alternating current power plug.

(g) Except as provided in subdivision (h), installation of an electric vehicle charging station for the exclusive use of an owner in a common area, that is not an exclusive use common area, shall be authorized by the association only if installation in the owner’s designated parking space is impossible or unreasonably expensive. In such cases, the association shall enter into a license agreement with the owner for the use of the space in a common area, and the owner shall comply with all of the requirements in subdivision (f).

(h) The association or owners may install an electric vehicle charging station in the common area for the use of all members of the association and, in that case, the association shall develop appropriate terms of use for the charging station.

(i) An association may create a new parking space where one did not previously exist to facilitate the installation of an electric vehicle charging station.

(j) An association that willfully violates this section shall be liable to the applicant or other party for actual damages, and shall pay a civil penalty to the applicant or other party in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(k) In any action by a homeowner requesting to have an electric vehicle charging station installed and seeking to enforce compliance with this section, the prevailing plaintiff shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 525, Sec. 1.   (SB 770)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4745.1.

(a) Any covenant, restriction, or condition contained in any deed, contract, security instrument, or other instrument affecting the transfer or sale of any interest in a common interest development, and any provision of a governing document, as defined in Section 4150, that either effectively prohibits or unreasonably restricts the installation or use of an EV-dedicated TOU meter or is in conflict with this section is void and unenforceable.

(b) (1) This section does not apply to provisions that impose reasonable restrictions on the installation of an EV-dedicated TOU meter. However, it is the policy of the state to promote, encourage, and remove obstacles to the effective installation of EV-dedicated TOU meters.

(2) For purposes of this section, “reasonable restrictions” are restrictions based upon space, aesthetics, structural integrity, and equal access to these services for all homeowners, but an association shall attempt to find a reasonable way to accommodate the installation request, unless the association would need to incur an expense.

(c) An EV-dedicated TOU meter shall meet applicable health and safety standards and requirements imposed by state and local authorities, and all other applicable zoning, land use, or other
ordinances, or land use permits.

(d) For purposes of this section, an “EV-dedicated TOU meter” means an electric meter supplied and installed by an electric utility, that is separate from, and in addition to, any other electric meter and is devoted exclusively to the charging of electric vehicles, and that tracks the time of use (TOU) when charging occurs. An “EV-dedicated TOU meter” includes any wiring or conduit necessary to connect the electric meter to an electric vehicle charging station, as defined in Section 4745, regardless of whether it is supplied or installed by an electric utility. 

(e) If approval is required for the installation or use of an EV-dedicated TOU meter, the application for approval shall be processed and approved by the association in the same manner as an application for approval of an architectural modification to the property, and shall not be
willfully avoided or delayed. The approval or denial of an application shall be in writing. If an application is not denied in writing within 60 days from the date of receipt of the application, the application shall be deemed approved, unless that delay is the result of a reasonable request for additional information.

(f) If the EV-dedicated TOU meter is to be placed in a common area or an exclusive use common area, as designated in the common interest development’s declaration, the following provisions apply:

(1) The owner first shall obtain approval from the association to install the EV-dedicated TOU meter and the association shall approve the installation if the owner agrees in writing to do both of the following:

(A) Comply with the association’s architectural standards for the installation of the EV-dedicated
TOU meter.

(B) Engage the relevant electric utility to install the EV-dedicated TOU meter and, if necessary, a licensed contractor to install wiring or conduit necessary to connect the electric meter to an EV charging station.

(2) The owner and each successive owner of an EV-dedicated TOU meter shall be responsible for all of the following:

(A) Costs for damage to the EV-dedicated TOU meter, common area, exclusive use common area, or separate interests resulting from the installation, maintenance, repair, removal, or replacement of the EV-dedicated TOU meter.

(B) Costs for the maintenance, repair, and replacement of the EV-dedicated TOU meter until it has been removed and for the restoration of the common area after removal.

(C) Disclosing to prospective buyers the existence of any EV-dedicated TOU meter of the owner and the related responsibilities of the owner under this section.

(g) The association or owners may install an EV-dedicated TOU meter in the common area for the use of all members of the association and, in that case, the association shall develop appropriate terms of use for the EV-dedicated TOU meter.

(h) An association that willfully violates this section shall be liable to the applicant or other party for actual damages, and shall pay a civil penalty to the applicant or other party in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(i) In any action by a homeowner requesting to have an EV-dedicated TOU meter installed and seeking to enforce compliance
with this section, the prevailing plaintiff shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 376, Sec. 2.   (SB 1016)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4746.

(a) When reviewing a request to install a solar energy system on a multifamily common area roof shared by more than one homeowner pursuant to Sections 714 and 714.1, an association shall require both of the following:

(1) An applicant to notify each owner of a unit in the building on which the installation will be located of the application to install a solar energy system.

(2) The owner and each successive owner to maintain a homeowner liability coverage policy at all times and provide the association with the corresponding certificate of insurance within 14 days of approval of the application and annually thereafter.

(b) When reviewing a request to install a solar energy system on a multifamily common area roof shared by more than one homeowner pursuant to Sections 714 and 714.1, an association may impose additional reasonable provisions that:

(1) (A) Require the applicant to submit a solar site survey showing the placement of the solar energy system prepared by a licensed contractor or the contractor’s registered salesperson knowledgeable in the installation of solar energy systems to determine usable solar roof area. This survey or the costs to determine useable
space shall not be deemed as part of the cost of the system as used in Section 714.

(B) The solar site survey shall also include a determination of an equitable allocation of the usable solar roof area among all owners sharing the same roof, garage, or carport.

(2) Require the owner and each successive owner of the solar energy system to be responsible for all of the following:

(A) Costs for damage to the common area, exclusive use common area, or separate interests resulting from the installation, maintenance, repair, removal, or replacement of the solar energy system.

(B) Costs for the maintenance, repair, and replacement of solar energy system until it has been removed and for the restoration of the common area, exclusive use common area, or separate
interests after removal.

(C) Disclosing to prospective buyers the existence of any solar energy system of the owner and the related responsibilities of the owner under this section.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Association” has the same meaning as defined in Section 4080 or 6528.

(2) “Common area” has the same meaning as defined in Section 4095 or 6532.

(3) “Separate interest” has the same meaning as defined in Section 4185 or 6564.

(d) This section imposes additional requirements for any proposed installation of a solar energy system on a multifamily common area roof shared by more than one homeowner.

(e) This section does not diminish the authority of an association to impose reasonable provisions pursuant to Section 714.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 818, Sec. 3.   (AB 634)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4747.

(a) Any covenant, restriction, or condition contained in any deed, contract, security instrument, or other instrument affecting the transfer or sale of any interest in a planned development, and any provision of a governing document, is void and unenforceable if it effectively prohibits or unreasonably restricts an eligible housing development project from using the floor area ratio standards authorized under Section 65913.11 of the Government Code.

(b) This section does not apply to provisions that impose reasonable restrictions on an eligible housing development that do not make the implementation of the floor area standards authorized in Section 65913.11 of the
 Government Code infeasible.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Eligible housing development project” means a housing development project that meets the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 65913.11 of the Government Code.

(2) “Reasonable restrictions” means restrictions that do not unreasonably increase the cost to construct, effectively prohibit the construction of, or extinguish the ability to otherwise construct an eligible housing development project using the
 floor area ratio standards in a manner authorized by Section 65913.11 of the Government Code.

(d) The Legislature finds and declares that the provision of adequate housing, in light of the severe shortage of housing at all income levels in this state, is a matter of statewide concern and that this section serves a significant and legitimate public purpose by eliminating potential restrictions that could inhibit the production of adequate housing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 363, Sec. 1.   (SB 478)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4750.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “personal agriculture” has the same definition as in Section 1940.10.

(b) Any provision of a governing document, as defined in Section 4150, shall be void and unenforceable if it effectively prohibits or unreasonably restricts the use of a homeowner’s backyard for personal agriculture.

(c) (1) This section does not apply to provisions that impose reasonable restrictions on the use of a homeowner’s yard for personal agriculture.

(2) For purposes of this section, “reasonable restrictions” are restrictions that do not significantly increase the cost of engaging in personal agriculture or significantly decrease its efficiency.

(d) This section applies only to yards that are designated for the exclusive use of the homeowner.

(e) This section shall not prohibit a homeowners’ association from applying rules and regulations requiring that dead plant material and weeds, with the exception of straw, mulch, compost, and other organic materials intended to encourage vegetation and retention of moisture in the soil, are regularly cleared from the backyard.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 584, Sec. 3.   (AB 2561)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4751.

(a) Any covenant, restriction, or condition contained in any deed, contract, security instrument, or other instrument affecting the transfer or sale of any interest in a planned development, and any provision of a governing document, that either effectively prohibits or unreasonably restricts the construction or use of an accessory dwelling unit or junior accessory dwelling unit on a lot zoned for single-family residential use that meets the requirements of Article 2 (commencing with Section 66314) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 66333) of Chapter 13 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code, is void and unenforceable.

(b) This section does not apply to provisions that impose reasonable restrictions on accessory dwelling units or junior accessory dwelling
 units. For purposes of this subdivision, “reasonable restrictions” means restrictions that do not unreasonably increase the cost to construct, effectively prohibit the construction of, or extinguish the ability to otherwise construct, an accessory dwelling unit or junior accessory dwelling unit consistent with the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 66314) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 66333) of Chapter 13 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 7, Sec. 2.   (SB 477)   Effective March 25, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4752.

(a) Any covenant, restriction, or condition contained in any deed, contract, security instrument, or other instrument, and any provision of a governing document shall be void and unenforceable to the extent that it prohibits, or includes conditions that have the effect of prohibiting, a substantially similar reconstruction of a residential structure that was destroyed or damaged in a disaster.

(b) A court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees to the owner of a separate interest in a common interest development who prevails in an action to enforce this section.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following
 definitions apply:

(1) “Disaster” means any of the following:

(A) A state of disaster or emergency declared by the federal government.

(B) A state of emergency proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code.

(C) A local emergency proclaimed by a local governing body or official pursuant to Section 8630 of the Government Code.

(2) “Objective design standard” means a standard that involves no personal or subjective judgment and is uniformly verifiable by reference to an external and uniform benchmark or criterion available and knowable by both the applicant and the
 association before submittal.

(3) “Substantially similar reconstruction of a residential structure” means a proposal that rebuilds a residential structure on a separate interest located in a common interest development that complies with all of the following:

(A) (i) The local building code.

(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, a proposal shall be considered to be in compliance with the local building code if the building permit is deemed approved by the local agency with appropriate jurisdiction.

(B) The interior livable square footage of the rebuilt residential structure will not exceed 110 percent of the square footage that
 existed when the structure was damaged or destroyed.

(C) The exterior footprint of the rebuilt
 residential structure will meet either of the following:

(i) The rebuilt residential structure will be constructed in the same location and to the same exterior dimensions as the structure that was damaged or destroyed.

(ii) The setbacks for the rebuilt residential structure will be at least four feet from the side and rear lot lines.

(D) The height of the rebuilt residential structure will not exceed 110 percent of the height that existed when the residential structure was damaged or destroyed, or 100 percent of the height allowed by the governing documents of the association in effect at the time the proposal was submitted, whichever is greater.

(E) Any objective design standard in effect at the time the original residential structure was destroyed or damaged in a disaster, provided that the standard does not unreasonably increase the cost to construct, effectively prohibit the construction of, or extinguish the ability to otherwise rebuild, a substantially similar
 residential structure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 548, Sec. 1.   (SB 625)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4753.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “clothesline” includes a cord, rope, or wire from which laundered items may be hung to dry or air. A balcony, railing, awning, or other part of a structure or building shall not qualify as a clothesline.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “drying rack” means an apparatus from which laundered items may be hung to dry or air. A balcony, railing,
awning, or other part of a structure or building shall not qualify as a drying rack.

(c) Any provision of a governing document, as defined in Section 4150, shall be void and unenforceable if it effectively prohibits or unreasonably restricts an owner’s ability to use a clothesline or drying rack in the owner’s backyard.

(d) (1) This section does not apply to provisions that impose reasonable restrictions on an owner’s backyard for the use of a clothesline or drying rack.

(2) For purposes of this section, “reasonable restrictions” are restrictions that do not significantly increase the cost of using a clothesline or drying rack.

(3) This section applies only to backyards that are designated for the exclusive use of the owner.

(e) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an association from establishing and enforcing reasonable rules governing clotheslines or drying racks.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4750.10 by Stats. 2016, Ch. 714, Sec. 7.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Modification of Separate Interest [4760. - 4766.]

4760.

(a) Subject to the governing documents and applicable law, a member may do the following:

(1) Make any improvement or alteration within the boundaries of the member’s separate interest that does not impair the structural integrity or mechanical systems or lessen the support of any portions of the common interest development.

(2) Modify
the member’s separate interest, at the member’s expense, to facilitate access for persons who are blind, visually handicapped, deaf, or physically disabled, or to alter conditions which could be hazardous to these persons. These modifications may also include modifications of the route from the public way to the door of the separate interest for the purposes of this paragraph if the separate interest is on the ground floor or already accessible by an existing ramp or elevator. The right granted by this paragraph is subject to the following conditions:

(A) The modifications shall be consistent with applicable building code requirements.

(B) The modifications shall be consistent with the intent of otherwise applicable provisions of the governing documents pertaining to safety or aesthetics.

(C) Modifications external
to the dwelling shall not prevent reasonable passage by other residents, and shall be removed by the member when the separate interest is no longer occupied by persons requiring those modifications who are blind, visually handicapped, deaf, or physically disabled.

(D) Any member who intends to modify a separate interest pursuant to this paragraph shall submit plans and specifications to the association for review to determine whether the modifications will comply with the provisions of this paragraph. The association shall not deny approval of the proposed modifications under this paragraph without good cause.

(b) Any change in the exterior appearance of a separate interest shall be in accordance with the governing documents and applicable provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4765.

(a) This section applies if the governing documents require association approval before a member may make a physical change to the member’s separate interest or to the common area. In reviewing and approving or disapproving a proposed change, the association shall satisfy the following requirements:

(1) The association shall provide a fair, reasonable, and expeditious procedure for making its
decision. The procedure shall be included in the association’s governing documents. The procedure shall provide for prompt deadlines. The procedure shall state the maximum time for response to an application or a request for reconsideration by the board.

(2) A decision on a proposed change shall be made in good faith and may not be unreasonable, arbitrary, or capricious.

(3) Notwithstanding a contrary provision of the governing documents, a decision on a proposed change may not violate any governing provision of law, including, but not limited to, the Fair Employment and Housing Act (Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), or a building code or other applicable law governing land use or public safety.

(4) A decision on a proposed change shall be in writing. If a
proposed change is disapproved, the written decision shall include both an explanation of why the proposed change is disapproved and a description of the procedure for reconsideration of the decision by the board.

(5) If a proposed change is disapproved, the applicant is entitled to reconsideration by the board, at an open meeting of the board. This paragraph does not require reconsideration of a decision that is made by the board or a body that has the same membership as the board, at a meeting that satisfies the requirements of Article 2 (commencing with Section 4900) of Chapter 6. Reconsideration by the board does not constitute dispute resolution within the meaning of Section 5905.

(b) Nothing in this section authorizes a physical change to the common area in a manner that is inconsistent with an association’s governing documents, unless the change is required by law.

(c) An association shall annually provide its members with notice of any requirements for association approval of physical changes to property. The notice shall describe the types of changes that require association approval and shall include a copy of the procedure used to review and approve or disapprove a proposed change.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4766.

(a) Any covenant, restriction, or condition contained in any deed, contract, security instrument, or other instrument, and any provision of a governing document that subjects a substantially similar reconstruction of a residential structure that was destroyed or damaged in a disaster to review by a body shall be processed and approved in accordance with this section.

(b) (1) The body shall determine whether an application is complete or incomplete and provide written notice of this determination to the applicant no later than 30 calendar days after the body receives the application.

(2) If
 the body determines that an application is incomplete, the body shall simultaneously provide the applicant with a list of incomplete items and a description of how the application can be made complete.

(A) After receiving a notice that the application is incomplete, an applicant may cure and address the items that are deemed incomplete by the body by resubmitting the application.

(B) In the review of an application resubmitted pursuant to subparagraph (A), the body shall not require the applicant to include an item that was not identified as necessary in covenant, restriction, or condition contained in any deed, contract, security instrument, or other instrument, and any provision of a governing document in effect at the time the application was originally submitted.

(C) (i) If an applicant resubmits an application pursuant to subparagraph (A), the body shall determine whether the additional application has remedied all incomplete items listed in the determination issued pursuant to this paragraph.

(ii) The review and determination of the resubmitted application shall be subject to the timelines and requirements specified in this subdivision.

(3) If the body does not make a timely determination as required by this subdivision, the application or resubmitted application shall be deemed to be complete for the purposes of this section.

(c) Once an application is deemed complete, the body shall conduct any
 review of the proposed modification to the separate interest, including a substantially similar reconstruction of a residential structure, and do either of the following within 45 calendar days:

(1) If the body determines that the complete application is not compliant with the body’s lawfully adopted standards in effect at the time the application was first submitted, the body shall return in writing a full set of comments to the applicant with a comprehensive request for revisions.

(2) If the body determines that the complete application is compliant with the body’s lawfully adopted standards in
 effect at the time the application was first submitted, the body shall approve the application and notify the applicant accordingly.

(d) (1) If a body finds that a complete application is noncompliant, the body shall provide the applicant with a list of items that are noncompliant and a description of how the application can be remedied by the applicant within the time limits specified in subdivision (b).

(2) The body shall provide the list and description authorized by paragraph (1) when it transmits its determination to the applicant as required by subdivision (b).

(3) If a body denies an application based on a determination that the application is noncompliant, the applicant may attempt to remedy
 the application.

(4) If an applicant submits an application pursuant to paragraph (3), the additional application is subject to the timelines of a new application as specified in subdivision (b).

(e) (1) If an application is determined to be incomplete pursuant to subdivision (b) or determined to be noncompliant pursuant to subdivision (d), the body shall provide a process for the applicant to appeal that decision pursuant to Section 4765.

(2) The body shall provide a final written determination on the appeal no
 later than 60 calendar days after receipt of the applicant’s written appeal.

(f) (1) Once a body approves an application pursuant to this section, the body shall not subject the applicant to any appeals or additional hearings.

(2) The prohibition described in paragraph (1) does not apply to the applicant’s noncompliance with the approved application.

(g) A court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees to the applicant who prevails in an action to enforce this section.

(h) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Body” means an association, architectural review committee, or similar body.

(2) “Disaster” has the same meaning as in Section 4752.

(3) “Substantially similar reconstruction of a residential structure” has the same meaning as in Section 4752.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 548, Sec. 2.   (SB 625)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Maintenance [4775. - 4790.]

4775.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (4), unless otherwise provided in the declaration of a common interest development, the association is responsible for repairing, replacing, and maintaining the common area.

(2) (A) Unless otherwise provided in the declaration of a common interest development, or unless the utility service that failed is required to be maintained, repaired, or replaced by a public, private, or other utility service provider, the association is responsible for repairs and replacements necessary to restore interrupted gas, heat, water, or electrical services that begin in the common area even if the matter extends into a separate interest or the exclusive use common area appurtenant to a separate
 interest.

(B) This paragraph does not change any legal duty or obligation of a utility company or local government to repair or replace components pertaining to gas, heat, water, or electrical services.

(3) Unless otherwise provided in the declaration of a common interest development, the owner of each separate interest is responsible for repairing, replacing, and maintaining that separate interest.

(4) Unless otherwise provided in the declaration of a common interest development, the owner of each separate interest is responsible for maintaining the exclusive use common area appurtenant to that separate interest and the association is responsible for repairing and replacing the exclusive use common area.

(b) (1) An association’s
 board shall commence the process to make the repairs necessary to restore gas, heat, water, or electrical services, as required by this section, within 14 days of the interruption of services.

(2) If there are insufficient reserve funds available to cover the costs of repairs or replacements, as required by this section, an association may obtain competitive financing from a financial institution, in compliance with Section 5735, to pay for the costs of the repairs or replacements described in paragraph (1) without requiring a vote of the members and levy an emergency assessment to allow for the repayment of the loan. However, before obtaining that financing, the board shall pass a resolution containing written findings regarding the nature of the association’s expenses and how the association’s reserves do not cover the necessary costs. The resolution shall be distributed to the members with the notice of the emergency assessment and with
 notices otherwise required by law or governing documents pursuant to the board’s action, if any.

(3) Notwithstanding any other section of law or the association’s governing documents, if an association’s board is unable to meet a quorum within 14 days, pursuant to this section, then at the next duly noticed board meeting following the 14th day, the requirements for a quorum shall be reduced so that the total number of directors at that board meeting shall constitute a quorum. This reduced quorum shall only apply for the vote to commence the process specified in paragraph (1). The notice shall contain a provision indicating the use of a reduced quorum.

(4) Notwithstanding the requirements of Section 4910, if directors of an association are required to vote to initiate any repairs or replacements pursuant to this subdivision, voting may be performed by electronic means, including,
 but not limited to, email. All records of the vote shall be deemed association records and subject to the inspection and retention rules specified in Section 5210.

(c) The costs of temporary relocation during the repair, replacement, or maintenance of the areas within the responsibility of the association shall be borne by the owner of the separate interest affected.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to result in the personal liability of a director of an association.

(e) This section shall not apply if the association is in an area affected by one or more of the following conditions, and such condition or conditions materially affect the association’s ability to perform its responsibilities pursuant to this section:

(1) A state of disaster
 or emergency declared by the federal government.

(2) A state of emergency proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code.

(3) A local emergency proclaimed by a local governing body or official under Section 8630 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 288, Sec. 1.   (SB 900)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4777.

(a) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Adjacent separate interest” means a separate interest that is directly beside, above, or below a particular separate interest or the common area.

(2) “Authorized agent” means an individual, organization, or other entity that has entered into an
agreement with the association to act on the association’s behalf.

(3) “Broadcast application” means spreading pesticide over an area greater than two square feet.

(4) “Electronic delivery” means delivery of a document by electronic means to the electronic address at, or through which, an owner of a separate interest has authorized electronic delivery.

(5) “Licensed pest control operator” means anyone licensed by the state to apply pesticides.

(6) “Pest” means a living organism that causes damage to property or economic loss, or transmits or produces diseases.

(7) “Pesticide” means any substance, or mixture of substances, that is intended to be used for controlling, destroying, repelling,
or mitigating any pest or organism, excluding antimicrobial pesticides as defined by the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 136(mm)).

(b) (1) An association or its authorized agent that applies any pesticide to a separate interest or to the common area without a licensed pest control operator shall provide the owner and, if applicable, the tenant of an affected separate interest and, if making broadcast applications, or using total release foggers or aerosol sprays, the owner and, if applicable, the tenant in an adjacent separate interest that could reasonably be impacted by the pesticide use with written notice that contains the following statements and information using words with common and everyday meaning:

(A) The pest or pests to be controlled.

(B) The name
and brand of the pesticide product proposed to be used.

(C) “State law requires that you be given the following information: